src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON kv_flt19
 +N+Fem:^EPH^OEA F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem:^EPH      F_PLDAT  ;
 +N+Fem:^EPH^OEA F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^EPH^OEA F_PLGEN   ;


LEXICON kv20 ! ær (only)
 +N+Fem:ær S_F_SGNAD      ;
 +N+Fem:ær S_F_SGGEN_NULL ;
 +N+Fem:ær F_PLNA_NULL    ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:óm  ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ónum  ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ærnum ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem:á  F_PLGEN        ;


LEXICON kv21 ! gjógv
 kv21e    ;
 kv_flt21 ;
 
LEXICON kv21e 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:ógvin    ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ónna     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ónni     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:áar      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:áarinnar ENDLEX ;

LEXICON kv_flt21
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:áir      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:áirnar   ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:áir      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:áirnar   ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:áum      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:áunum    ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:áa       ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:áanna    ENDLEX ;
   
LEXICON kv21_b
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ó      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:óin    ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ó      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ónna     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ó      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ónni     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:áar      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:áarinnar ENDLEX ;
 kv_flt21 ;



LEXICON kv22 ! klógv, rógv  stem: kl-, r-
  kv22e    ;
  kv_flt22 ;

LEXICON kv22e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:ógvin    ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ónna     ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ógv      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ónni     ENDLEX ;
              +N+Fem:ó        S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt22
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:øur     ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:ørnar   ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:øur     ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:ørnar   ENDLEX ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:óm      ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ónum    ENDLEX ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ørnum   ENDLEX ; ! klørnum
              +N+Fem:ógv     F_PLGEN   ;


LEXICON kv23 ! trúgv
  kv23e    ;
  kv_flt23 ;

LEXICON kv23e
       +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:            DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:            FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:^GVDEL%>nna FemObl_Flag ;
       +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:            R ; ! stem compound
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:            FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>nni FemObl_Flag ;
              +N+Fem:^GVDEL      S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt23
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv24/2
  :ú kv2  ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:únna FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:únni FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:ýr FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:ýrnar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:ýr FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:ýrnar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:úm FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:únum FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ýrnum FemObl_Flag ;

LEXICON kv24/6
  kv24 ;
  :úgv kv6  ;
  
!LEXICON kv24/6e
!  kv24 ;
!  kv6e  ;

!LEXICON kv24e/6e
!  kv24e ;
!  kv6e  ;

LEXICON kv24 ! kúgv
  kv24e    ;
  kv_flt24 ;

LEXICON kv24e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:úgv DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:úgv      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:únna FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc: R ; ! stem compound
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:úgv      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:únni FemObl_Flag ; ! oynni, consider i:n <=> 
 +N+Fem:úgv S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt24
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:ýr FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:ýrnar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:ýr FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:ýrnar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:úm FemObl_Flag   ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:únum FemObl_Flag   ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ýrnum FemObl_Flag   ;
 +N+Fem:úgv F_PLGEN   ;


LEXICON kv25 ! gás
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:gás 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:gásin 	    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:gás 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:gásina     FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:gás 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:gásini     FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:gásar 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:gásarinnar FemObl_Flag ;

 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:gæs 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:gæsnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:gæs 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:gæsnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:gásum 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:gásunum 	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:gæsnum 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:gása 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:gásanna 	FemObl_Flag ;


LEXICON kv26 ! tá
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:tá 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:táin 	    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:tá 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:tánna      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:tá 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:tánni      FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:táar 	    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:táarinnar  FemObl_Flag ;

 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:tær 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:tærnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:tær 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:tærnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:tóm 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:tónum	 	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:tærnum 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:táa 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:táanna 	FemObl_Flag ;



LEXICON kv27 ! rás
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv_flt28
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:dyr		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:dyrnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:dyr 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:dyrnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:durum 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:durunum	 	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:dyrnum 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:dura 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:duranna 	FemObl_Flag ;


LEXICON kv29 ! móðir
 +N+Fem+Sg:móð kv29e    ;
 +N+Fem+Pl:møð kv_flt29 ;


LEXICON kv29e
 +Nom:ir DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +Acc:ur DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +Acc+Def:rina FemObl_Flag ;
 +Dat:ur DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +Dat+Def:rini FemObl_Flag ;
 +Gen:ur DF_G_SGf_S ;

LEXICON kv_flt29
 +Nom:ur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Acc:ur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Dat:ru DF_D_PL   ;
 +Gen:ra DF_G_PL   ;

LEXICON kv30 ! dóttir
 +N+Fem+Sg:dótt kv30e    ;
 +N+Fem+Pl:døt  kv_flt30 ;

LEXICON kv30e
 +Nom:ir DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +Acc+Indef:ur FemObl_Flag ;
 +Acc+Def:rina FemObl_Flag ;
 +Dat:ur DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +Dat+Def:rini FemObl_Flag ;
 +Gen:ur DF_G_SGf_S ;


LEXICON kv_flt30
  kv_flt29 ;

LEXICON kv31 ! systir
       +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>ir  DF_N_SGf_S  ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:rina  FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ur    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:rini  FemObl_Flag ;
       +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ur  DF_G_SGf_S  ;
       +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:%>rar DF_NA_PLf   ;
       +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>rar DF_NA_PLf   ;
       +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>ru  DF_D_PL     ;
       +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>ra  DF_G_PL     ;
       
LEXICON kv32_1 ! byrða
 kv1e	  ;
 kv_flt32 ;      
       

LEXICON kv32 ! mýri
  kv32e    ;
  kv_flt32 ;

LEXICON kv32e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>i       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>i       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>i       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ina     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ini     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar FemObl_Flag ;


LEXICON kv_flt32
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>arnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>arnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>unum  FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>anna  FemObl_Flag ;

LEXICON kv33e/h24e
 kv33e ;
 h24e ;

LEXICON h24e/kv33e
 h24e ;
 kv33e ;

LEXICON kv33 ! gleði
  kv33e    ;
  kv_flt33 ;
