src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns 
tá+CmpNP/None: kv26 ;
frú+CmpNP/None:fr kv24/2 ;
gjó+CmpNP/None:gj kv21_b ;
rás+CmpNP/None:rás kv27 ;
LEXICON Nouns
ervaær:erva# kv20 ;
mjólkær:mjólk# kv20 ;
røktingarær:røktingar# kv20 ;
losær:los# kv20 ;
loðær:loð# kv20 ;
systradøtur:systra# kv_flt30 ;
abbadóttir:abba# kv30 ;
miðlingadóttir:miðlinga# kv30 ;
einkadóttir:einka# kv30 ;
stjúkdóttir:stjúk# kv30 ;
verdóttir:ver# kv30 ;
systurdóttir:systur# kv30 ;
móðurdóttir:móður# kv30 ;
ommudóttir:ommu# kv30 ;
gjó:gj kv21_b ;
láturgjógv:láturgj kv21 ;
loftgjógv:loftgj kv21 ;
trælalógv:trælal kv21 ;
fiskaflógv:fiskafl kv21 ;
útflógv:útfl kv21 ;
vetrarlógv:vetrarl kv21 ;
maðkakrógv:maðkakr kv21 ;
deyðseyðakrógv:deyðseyðakr kv21 ;
systir:syst kv31 ;
langabbasystir:langabbasyst kv31 ;
lítlasystir:lítlasyst kv31 ;
sjúkrasystir:sjúkrasyst kv31 ;
tvíburasystir:tvíburasyst kv31 ;
samsystir:samsyst kv31 ;
manssystir:manssyst kv31 ;
hálvsystir:hálv#syst kv31 ;
byrða:byrð kv32_1 ;
skattabyrða:skatta#byrð kv32_1 ;
tarvabyrða:tarva#byrð kv32_1 ;
bakbyrða:bak#byrð kv32_1 ;
skjútsbyrða:skjúts#byrð kv32_1 ;
próvbyrða:próv#byrð kv32_1 ;
frú:fr kv24/2 ;
ungfrú:ung#fr kv24/2 ;
dandisfrú:dandis#fr kv24/2 ;
lofnaklógv:lofnakl kv22 ;
mosaklógv:mosakl kv22 ;
lyngklógv:lyngkl kv22 ;
bitiklógv:bitikl kv22 ;
framklógv:framkl kv22 ;
arnarklógv:arnarkl kv22 ;
nábalsklógv:nábalskl kv22 ;
tógv:t kv22 ;
olmussuheiðarar:olmussuheiðar kv_flt32 ;
torvheiðar:torvheið kv_flt32 ;
sandoyri:sandoyr kv32 ;
vatnoyri:vatnoyr kv32 ;
lyngheiði:lyngheið kv32 ;
lundabyrði:lundabyrð kv32 ;
beringarbyrði:beringarbyrð kv32 ;
gersimi:gersim kv32 ;
heidni:heidni kv33e/h24e ;
kurteisi:kurteisi kv33e/h24e ;
hveiti:hveiti kv33e/h24e ;
lambaheiði:lamba#heið kv32 ;
korngrøði:korn#grøði kv33 ;
ivaær:iva# kv20 ;
aktingarær:aktingar# kv20 ;
brennivínsær:brennivíns# kv20 ;
helsingagás:helsinga# kv25 ;
geldgás:geld# kv25 ;
korngás:korn# kv25 ;
havgás:hav# kv25 ;
huldukúgv:hulduk kv24 ;
viðarbrúgv:viðarbr kv24/6 ;
hjartarfrúgv:hjartarfr kv24/6 ;
kristnitrúgv:kristnitrúgv kv23 ;
illtrúgv:illtrúgv kv23 ;
greivafrú:greiva#fr kv24/2 ;
greivafrúgv:greiva#fr kv24/6 ;
jomfrú:jom#fr kv24/2 ;
húsfrú:hús#fr kv24/2 ;
havfrú:hav#fr kv24/2 ;
respekt:respekt kv23 ;
trúgv:trúgv kv23 ;
andatrúgv:andatrúgv kv23 ;
fleirgudatrúgv:fleirgudatrúgv kv23 ;
villutrúgv:villutrúgv kv23 ;
styrki:styrki kv33 ;
lívsævi:lívsævi kv33 ;
virði:virði kv33 ;
landafrøði:landafrøði kv33 ;
gudfrøði:gudfrøði kv33 ;
heilsufrøði:heilsufrøði kv33 ;
eygnabrún:eygnabrún kv24 ;
feginsbrún:feginsbrún kv24 ;
maikúgv:maik kv24 ;
mjólkkúgv:mjólkk kv24 ;
bjøllukúgv:bjølluk kv24 ;
riðkúgv:riðk kv24 ;
murtnabrúgv:murtnabr kv24 ;
kennisemi:kenni#sem h24e/kv33e ;
leiðisemi:leiði#sem h24e/kv33e ;
ótakksemi:ó#takk#sem h24e/kv33e ;
gagnsemi:gagn#sem h24e/kv33e ;
miskunnsemi:mis#kunn#sem h24e/kv33e ;
keðsemi:keð#sem h24e/kv33e ;
góðsemi:góð#sem h24e/kv33e ;
oddagás:odda# kv25 ;
brandgás:brand# kv25 ;
bramgás:bram# kv25 ;
tápugás:tápu# kv25 ;
stokkabrúgv:stokkabr kv24/6 ;
vongbrúgv:vongbr kv24/6 ;
ísbrúgv:ísbr kv24/6 ;
flotbrúgv:flotbr kv24/6 ;
træbrúgv:træbr kv24/6 ;
tá: kv26 ;
lítlatá:lítla# kv26 ;
stóratá:stóra# kv26 ;
aftastatá:aftasta# kv26 ;
fremstatá:fremsta# kv26 ;
baktá:bak# kv26 ;
framtá:fram# kv26 ;
glopradyr:glopra# kv_flt28 ;
handilsdyr.handils# kv_flt28 ;
inndyr:inn# kv_flt28 ;
krambúðardyr:kram#búðar# kv_flt28 ;
neystadyr:neysta# kv_flt28 ;
útidyr:úti# kv_flt28 ;
portursdyr:porturs# kv_flt28 ;
frádyr:frá# kv_flt28 ;
vangafjaðrar:vangafjaður kv_flt19 ;
barnamóðir:barna# kv29 ;
stjúkmóðir:stjúk# kv29 ;
ættarmóðir:ættar# kv29 ;
burðarmóðir:burðar# kv29 ;
formóðir:for# kv29 ;
ravnsmóðir:ravns# kv29 ;
ljósmóðir:ljós# kv29 ;
ættmóðir:ætt# kv29 ;
leðurrógv:leðurr kv22e ;
fólkatrúgv:fólkatrúgv kv23e ;
turkatrúgv:turkatrúgv kv23e ;
trøllatrúgv:trøllatrúgv kv23e ;
barnatrúgv:barnatrúgv kv23e ;
ásatrúgv:ásatrúgv kv23e ;
bókstavatrúgv:bókstavatrúgv kv23e ;
mistrúgv:mistrúgv kv23e ;
pátrúgv:pátrúgv kv23e ;
dagsbrúgv:dagsbr kv24e ;
feginsbrúgv:feginsbr kv24e ;
ófeginsbrúgv:ófeginsbr kv24e ;
rútarfrúgv:rútarfr kv24e ;
spaðarfrúgv:spaðarfr kv24e ;
súgv:s kv24e ;
vágsmóðir:vágs# kv29e ;
perlumóðir:perlu# kv29e ;
skølingsbrýr:skølingsbrugv kv_flt24 ;
pufferma:puff#erm kv32_1 ;
